Florida, session 2026, HB819.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (3) is added to section 406.11,
Florida Statutes, to read:
406.11 Examinations, investigations, and autopsies.—
(3)(a) As used in this subsection, the term:
1. "Sudden Arrhythmic Death Syndrome(SADS)" means the
sudden and unexpected death due to cardiac arrhythmia, as
determined by performance of an autopsy or a clinical
investigation, of a young, apparently healthy individual with no
previously diagnosed structural heart disease.
2. "Sudden Death in the Young (SDY)" means the sudden and
unexpected death of an individual younger than 20 years of age
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb819-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 819 2026
due to natural causes, including, but not limited to, sudden
cardiac death or sudden unexpected death in epilepsy, which
death remains unexplained after initial investigation.
3. "Sudden Infant Death Syndrome (SIDS)" means the sudden
death of an infant younger than 1 year of age which remains
unexplained after a thorough case investigation, including
performance of an autopsy, scene investigations, and a review of
clinical history.
4. "Sudden Unexpected Infant Death (SUID)" means the
sudden and unexpected death of an infant younger than 1 year of
age, whether explained or unexplained, including, but not
limited to, death caused by SIDS, accidental suffocation, and
other potential causes.
5. "Sudden Unexpected Infant Death (SUID) and Sudden Death
in the Young (SDY) Case Registry" means the national
surveillance system coordinated by the Centers for Disease
Control and Prevention and the National Institutes of Health
which collects standardized data on sudden and unexpected deaths
in individuals younger than 20 years of age.
(b) In the case of an infant or child who dies suddenly
and unexpectedly, including cases of SIDS, SUID, or SDY, the
autopsy must include microscopic and toxicology studies and a
review of the child's immunization and medical records, as
available through the state's immunization registry established
pursuant to s. 381.003, from the child's pediatrician or primary
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb819-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 819 2026
care practitioner, or from other sources. The medical examiner
shall document in the autopsy report any immunizations or
emergency countermeasures administered to the child within 90
days before the child's death and report the case to the SUID
and SDY Case Registry in accordance with protocols established
by the Department of Health and the Centers for Disease Control
and Prevention.
(c) In the case of a sudden death suspected to be caused
by SADS in an individual of any age, the autopsy must include
microscopic and toxicology studies and a review of the
individual's immunization and medical records, as available
through state health databases or other sources. The medical
examiner shall document in the autopsy report any immunizations
or emergency countermeasures administered to the individual
within 90 days before his or her death and report the case to
the SUID and SDY Case Registry if the individual was younger
than 20 years of age at the time of death, in accordance with
protocols established by the Department of Health and the
Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.
(d) The Department of Health shall impose the following
administrative penalties against a district medical examiner who
fails to report a case of SIDS, SUID, SDY, or SADS, for
individuals younger than 20 years of age, to the SUID and SDY
Case Registry within 30 days after completing the autopsy
100 report:
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb819-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 819 2026
101 1. For the first unreported case, a fine of up to $1,000.
102 2. For the second unreported case, a fine of up to $5,000.
103 3. For repeated noncompliance, referral to the Medical
104 Examiners Commission for disciplinary action, which may include
105 suspension or removal pursuant to s. 406.075.
106 (e) Compliance with the reporting and documentation
107 requirements of this section is deemed a permissible disclosure
108 under state and federal medical privacy laws, including the
109 Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996.
110 (f) The Department of Health may adopt rules to implement
111 this subsection.
112 Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb819-00